Missouri, session 2026, HB3365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 301.4101, to read as follows:
301.4101. A political subdivision, municipality, or local entity may prohibit the
2 operation of fully autonomous vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand
3 autonomous vehicle networks, or otherwise enact or keep in force rules or ordinances
4 that would impose taxes, fees, or other requirements, including performance standards,
5 specific to the operation of fully autonomous vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-
6 demand autonomous vehicle networks.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.